Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 10

Department of Human Services

25-10-102. Organization generally.

25-10-106. Division heads and other personnel.

25-10-118. Child support enforcement program — Reports.

25-10-141. Subpoenas in administrative adjudications.

Subchapter 4

— Department of Human Services State Institutional System

Cross References. Arkansas Energy Office Division, §15-10-203.

Enterprise zones, §15-4-1701 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 38, §§ 23, 24: Act effective Feb. 4, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an immediate need to establish a more responsive and responsible state government sufficiently flexible to meet changing conditions and to establish executive authority in those areas where executive responsibility presently lies and to promote economies in the operation of the government by the consolidation of various departments, boards, and commissions; and that only by the immediate passage of this act may procedures be established for effectuating a more responsive, responsible, and economic state government. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 65, § 10: approved Feb. 7, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the General Assembly that the State of Arkansas has had heretofore an inadequate program for the economic development of the State and its several sections; that on account of such inadequate program the State of Arkansas has been unable to provide for its inhabitants sufficient opportunities in agriculture and industry; that unless an adequate program for the economic development of the State be immediately undertaken the State of Arkansas will suffer immediate and irreparable further loss in the opportunity for economic expansion; and that only by the passage of this Act and giving immediate effect to its provisions can the State of Arkansas further secure for its inhabitants opportunities for economic development. An emergency, therefore, is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1981, No. 41, § 10: Feb. 10, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Industrial Development Commission as established by Act 404 of 1955 rendered great service to the State of Arkansas in developing programs, objectives, and goals for the industrial development of this State, and that the “AIDC” emblem became symbolic, not only in this State but throughout the Nation, of Arkansas' outstanding industrial and economic potential and growth; and that the reestablishment of the Arkansas Department of Industrial Development and the Arkansas Industrial Development Commission (AIDC) is essential to the State in gaining the continuing advantages of the economic progress instituted more than a quarter of a century ago; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to accomplish said purposes and to provide means for accelerated progress in the economic development of this State, thereby providing for increased payrolls, job opportunities, and tax income for the support of the public services of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2007, No. 1602, §8: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act renames the Department of Economic Development and the Arkansas Economic Development Commission and that the ideal time to implement these names changes is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2013, No. 1111, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the weatherization services provided to eligible recipients of the Weatherization Assistance Program need to be continued; that eligible recipients should not be subject to a lengthy delay due to the transition of the Weatherization Assistance Program; that the financial benefits of the weatherization services provided reduce the amount of money spent on utilities and offer a greater level of comfort to recipients; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure there is no delay in services provided to qualified individuals in need of weatherization services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-11-101. Creation — Director — Organization — Personnel.

There is created the Arkansas Economic Development Commission.

The executive head of the commission shall be the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission. The director shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice of the Arkansas Economic Development Council and the consent of the Senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Commerce.

The commission shall consist of the divisions that may be necessary to fulfill its purposes and that may be created by law and placed under the commission.

The director, with the advice and consent of the Governor, shall appoint the heads of the respective divisions. All other personnel of the commission shall be employed by and shall serve at the pleasure of the director. However, nothing in this section shall be so construed as to reduce any right that an employee of the commission shall have under any civil service or merit system.

Each division of the commission shall be under the direction, control, and supervision of the director. The director may delegate his or her functions, powers, and duties to various divisions of the commission as he or she shall deem desirable and necessary for the effective and efficient operation of the commission.

All personnel of the commission are employees of the Department of Commerce.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 1602, § 1, provided: “SECTION 1. Department of Economic Development renamed Arkansas Economic Development Commission.

“(a)(1)The Department of Economic Development, as it is referred to or empowered through the Arkansas Code, is renamed.

“(2)In its place, the Arkansas Economic Development Commission is established, succeeding to the general powers and responsibilities previously assigned to the Department of Economic Development.

“(3)The Director of the Department of Economic Development shall identify and revise all interagency agreements, financial instruments, funds, and other necessary legal documents in order to effect this change.”

“(b)Nothing in this act shall be construed as impairing the powers and authority of the Department of Economic Development before the effective date of the name change.

“(c)Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Economic Development may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission.”

Acts 2007, No. 1602, § 2, provided: “SECTION 2. Arkansas Economic Development Commission renamed Arkansas Economic Development Council.

“(a)(1)The Arkansas Economic Development Commission, as it is referred to or empowered through the Arkansas Code, is renamed.

“(2)In its place, the Arkansas Economic Development Council is established, succeeding to the general powers and responsibilities previously assigned to the Arkansas Economic Development Commission.

“(3)The Chair of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission shall identify and revise all interagency agreements, financial instruments, funds, and other necessary legal documents in order to effect this change.

“(b)Nothing in this act shall be construed as impairing the powers and authority of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission before the effective date of the name change.

“(c)Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas Economic Development Council.”

Acts 2007, No. 1602, § 6, provided: “SECTION 6.

“(a)This act shall not be construed as impairing the continued effectiveness of any rules or orders promulgated or issued by the Department of Economic Development or the Arkansas Economic Development Commission before the effective date of this act.

“(b)This act shall not be construed as extinguishing or otherwise affecting the unexpired terms of any current members of the Arkansas Economic Development Commission.”

Acts 2007, No. 1602, § 7, provided: “SECTION 7. The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make all changes in the Arkansas Code necessary to effectuate the intent of this act.”

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1971, No. 38, § 6, which enacted this section, created a Department of Industrial Development into which the Arkansas Industrial Development Commission, created by §15-4-101 et seq., was transferred by a type 4 transfer.

Acts 1979, No. 65, § 2, amended this section to create a Department of Economic Development into which the Department of Industrial Development and the Arkansas Industrial Development Commission were transferred by a type 3 transfer. The amendment also created an Arkansas Economic Development Commission whose powers, membership, etc., were to be as specified in §15-4-101 et seq. governing the former Arkansas Industrial Development Commission.

Acts 1981, No. 41, § 2, amended the section to create a Department of Industrial Development into which the Arkansas Department of Economic Development and the Arkansas Economic Development Commission were transferred by a type 3 transfer.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment redesignated (b) as (b)(1), and added (b)(2); and added (f).

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 6; 1979, No. 65, § 2; 1981, No. 41, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-906; Acts 1997, No. 540, § 49; 2007, No. 1602, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 619.

25-11-102. Arkansas Economic Development Council.

There is created an Arkansas Economic Development Council, whose membership, authorities, and powers shall be as specified in §§15-4-201 —15-4-204,15-4-209,15-4-501 —15-4-503,15-4-505 —15-4-515,15-4-517,15-4-518, and15-4-520 —15-4-525.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 6; 1979, No. 65, § 2; 1981, No. 41, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-906; Acts 1997, No. 540, § 50; 2007, No. 1602, § 5.

Publisher's Notes. Regarding previous transfers of the commission, see Publisher's Notes to §25-11-101.

25-11-103.
[Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. The repeal of this section by Acts 2019, No. 790, supersedes the amendment of this section by Acts 2019, No. 910.Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3249, amended this section to read as follows:“25-11-103. Funds transfer to the Weatherization Assistance Program.The Division of Environmental Quality shall transfer annually to the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality a minimum of fifteen percent (15%) and up to a maximum of twenty-five percent (25%), as allowed by federal law or regulation, of the annual allocation for the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program to be used by the Weatherization Assistance Program of the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality.”

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning funds transfer to the Weatherization Assistance Program, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 790, § 2, effective July 24, 2019. The section was derived by Acts 2013, No. 1111, § 1; 2017, No. 271, § 25; 2019, No. 910, §3249. For current law, see §20-80-312.

25-10-104. Developmental disabilities services — Board of Developmental Disabilities Services.

25-10-113. Disposition of direct services funds.

25-10-126. Grants-in-aid — Conditions for receiving funds.

25-10-143. Advisory opinions — Definition.